Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 5. SANITATION AND ENVIRONMENTAL QUALITY

SUBTITLE B. SOLID WASTE, TOXIC CHEMICALS, SEWAGE, LITTER, AND WATER

CHAPTER 373. WATER CONSERVATION

Sec. 373.001. XERISCAPE ASSISTANCE PROGRAM. (a) The board on request shall assist counties and municipalities by providing a model xeriscape code and other technical assistance.

(b) The board shall work with counties and municipalities to promote, through educational programs and publications, the use of xeriscape practices, including the use of compost, in existing residential and commercial development.

(c) In this section:

(1) "Board" means the Texas Water Development Board.

(2) "Xeriscape" has the meaning assigned by Section 2166.404, Government Code.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 642, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 17.19(17), eff. Sept. 1, 1997.